District of Columbia statutes.
16-508

Attachment of real property.

An attachment is sufficiently levied on the lands and tenements of the defendant by:

(1)

mentioning and describing the property in an indorsement on the attachment, made by the officer to whom it is delivered for service, to the following effect:

“Levied on the following estate of the defendant, A B, to wit: (Here describe) this __ day of ____. C D, Marshal.”; and

(2)

serving a copy of the attachment, with the indorsement, and the notice required by section 16-502, on the person, if any, in possession of the property.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 546, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-508.
1973 Ed., § 16-508.